Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4325.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ending September 30, 2025, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 25.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 25.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Full-time equated classified positions 25.0 Payroll fraud enforcement unit--FTEs 25.0 $ 5,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 5,000,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 is $5,000,000.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for payroll fraud enforcement unit must be used to hire approximately 25 FTEs to investigate and prosecute cases, including payroll fraud cases. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for payroll fraud enforcement unit are designated as a work project 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 appropriation. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for the project under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to hire approximately 25 FTEs to investigate and prosecute cases, including payroll fraud cases. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $5,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. (3) As used in this section, "FTEs" means full-time equated employees.